West Virginia, session 2026, HB4050.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. DUTIES AND PRIVILEGES OF PUBLIC UTILITIES SUBJECT TO REGULATIONS OF COMMISSION. §24-3-11. Reporting by utilities that are members of a regional transmission organization. (a)  As used in this section:"Affiliate" means a person who directly or indirectly, or through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, or has, directly or indirectly, any economic interest in another person."Meeting" means any committee, user group, task force or any other part of the regional transmission organization in which votes are taken."Recorded vote" means any final or non-final vote that is tabulated, individually or as part of a sector, for any purpose at a meeting, regardless of whether the vote represents a final position of any entity casting a vote or the decision-making authority of those voting."Regional Transmission Organization" means an entity that qualifies as a regional transmission organization under 18 C.F.R. § 35.34 (2006).(b) This section applies only to public utilities that are members of a regional transmission organization.(c) (1) On or before February 1 each year, each public utility that is a member of a regional transmission organization shall submit to the commission a report of any recorded vote cast by the public utility or an affiliate at a meeting of that regional transmission organization during the immediately preceding calendar year.(2) The report shall include: (A) All recorded votes cast by the public utility, regardless of whether the vote is otherwise disclosed; (B) All votes cast by any affiliate of the public utility, where the public service utility did not vote on the matter; and (C) A brief description explaining how each vote cast by the public utility or its affiliate, as  appropriate, is in the interest of the public.